LexC.seemode/Contents/Resources/English.lproj/ExampleSyntax.txt
!! !!!Adjective stems

LEXICON Adjective

 adjdivvun ATTR_0 ;
 tjearoske+Sem/Dummytag:tjearosk Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
 aareske+Sem/Dummytag:aaresk Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP "steinete" ;

LEXICON BodyPart
 +N+Abs: # ;
 +N+Rfx:%>áng # ;
